Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part 1
General Provisions [Effective January 1, 2023.]

7-13.1-101.
Short title. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Limited Partnership Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-102.
Definitions. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

As used in this chapter:

“Certificate of limited partnership” means the certificate required by §

7-13.1-201

. The term includes the certificate as amended or restated.

“Contribution”, except in the phrase “right of contribution”, means property or a benefit described in §

7-13.1-501

which is provided by a person to a limited partnership to become a partner or in the person’s capacity as a partner.

“Debtor in bankruptcy” means a person that is the subject of:

An order for relief under Title 11 of the United States Code or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application; or

A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency.

“Deliver” means either physically transferring a paper document to the secretary of state or transferring a document to the secretary of state by electronic transmission through a medium provided and authorized by the secretary of state. “Delivered” and “delivering” have a corresponding meaning.

“Distribution” means a transfer of money or other property from a limited partnership to a person on account of a transferable interest or in the person’s capacity as a partner. The term:

Includes:

A redemption or other purchase by a limited partnership of a transferable interest; and

A transfer to a partner in return for the partner’s relinquishment of any right to participate as a partner in the management or conduct of the partnership’s activities and affairs or to have access to records or other information concerning the partnership’s activities and affairs; and

Does not include amounts constituting reasonable compensation for present or past service or payments made in the ordinary course of business under a bona fide retirement plan or other bona fide benefits program.

“Electronic transmission” means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper that creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and renewed by a recipient thereof, and may be directly reproduced in a paper form by such a recipient through an automated process.

“Foreign limited liability limited partnership” means a foreign limited partnership whose general partners have limited liability for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the foreign partnership under a provision similar to §

7-13.1-404(c)

.

“Foreign limited partnership” means an unincorporated entity formed under the law of a jurisdiction other than this state which would be a limited partnership if formed under the law of this state. The term includes a foreign limited liability limited partnership.

“General partner” means a person that:

Has become a general partner under §

7-13.1-401

or was a general partner in a partnership when the partnership became subject to this chapter under §

7-13.1-112

; and

Has not dissociated as a general partner under §

7-13.1-603

.

“Jurisdiction”, used to refer to a political entity, means the United States, a state, a foreign country, or a political subdivision of a foreign country.

“Jurisdiction of formation” means the jurisdiction whose law governs the internal affairs of an entity.

“Limited liability limited partnership”, except in the phrase “foreign limited liability limited partnership” and in part 11 of this chapter, means a limited partnership whose certificate of limited partnership states that the partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.

“Limited partner” means a person that:

Has become a limited partner under §

7-13.1-301

or was a limited partner in a limited partnership when the partnership became subject to this chapter under §

7-13.1-112

; and

Has not dissociated under §

7-13.1-601

.

“Limited partnership”, except in the phrase “foreign limited partnership” and in part 11 of this chapter, means an entity formed under this chapter or which becomes subject to this chapter under part 11 of this chapter or §

7-13.1-112

. The term includes a limited liability limited partnership.

“Partner” means a limited partner or general partner.

“Partnership agreement” means the agreement, whether or not referred to as a partnership agreement and whether oral, implied, in a record, or in any combination thereof, of all the partners of a limited partnership concerning the matters described in §

7-13.1-105(a)

. The term includes the agreement as amended or restated.

“Person” means an individual, business corporation, nonprofit corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, general cooperative association, limited cooperative association, unincorporated nonprofit association, cooperative housing corporation, workers’ cooperative, producers’ cooperative, consumer’s cooperative, statutory trust, business trust, common-law business trust, estate, trust, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Principal office” means the principal executive office of a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership, whether or not the office is located in this state.

“Property” means all property, whether real, personal, or mixed or tangible or intangible, or any right or interest therein.

“Record”, used as a noun, means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Registered agent” means an agent of a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership which is authorized to receive service of any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the partnership.

“Registered foreign limited partnership” means a foreign limited partnership that is registered to do business in this state pursuant to a statement of registration filed by the secretary of state.

“Required information” means the information that a limited partnership is required to maintain under §

7-13.1-108

.

“Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

“Signature” or “execution” means an original signature, facsimile, or an electronically transmitted signature submitted through a medium provided and authorized by the secretary of state. “Signed” and “executed” have a corresponding meaning.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Transfer” includes:

An assignment;

A conveyance;

A sale;

A lease;

An encumbrance, including a mortgage or security interest;

A gift; and

A transfer by operation of law.

“Transferable interest” means the right, as initially owned by a person in the person’s capacity as a partner, to receive distributions from a limited partnership, whether or not the person remains a partner or continues to own any part of the right. The term applies to any fraction of the interest, by whomever owned.

“Transferee” means a person to which all or part of a transferable interest has been transferred, whether or not the transferor is a partner. The term includes a person that owns a transferable interest under §

7-13.1-602(a)(3)

or

7-13.1-605(a)(4)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-103.
Knowledge; Notice. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A person knows a fact if the person:

Has actual knowledge of it; or

Is deemed to know it under law other than this chapter.

A person has notice of a fact if the person:

Has reason to know the fact from all the facts known to the person at the time in question; or

Is deemed to have notice of the fact under subsection (c) or (d) of this section.

A certificate of limited partnership on file in the office of the secretary of state is notice that the partnership is a limited partnership and the persons designated in the certificate as general partners are general partners. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, the certificate is not notice of any other fact.

A person not a partner is deemed to have notice of:

A person’s dissociation as a general partner ninety (90) days after an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership which states that the other person has dissociated becomes effective or ninety (90) days after a statement of dissociation pertaining to the other person becomes effective, whichever occurs first;

A limited partnership’s:

Dissolution ninety (90) days after an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership stating that the limited partnership is dissolved becomes effective;

Termination ninety (90) days after a statement of termination under §

7-13.1-802(b)(2)(vi)

becomes effective; and

Participation in a merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication, ninety (90) days after articles of merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication under part 11 of this chapter become effective.

Subject to §

7-13.1-210(f)

, a person notifies another person of a fact by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not those steps cause the other person to know the fact.

A general partner’s knowledge or notice of a fact relating to the limited partnership is effective immediately as knowledge of or notice to the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of the general partner. A limited partner’s knowledge or notice of a fact relating to the partnership is not effective as knowledge of or notice to the partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-104.
Governing law. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The law of this state governs:

The internal affairs of a limited partnership; and

The liability of a partner as partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-105.
Partnership agreement; Scope, function, and limitations. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the partnership agreement governs:

Relations among the partners as partners and between the partners and the limited partnership;

The activities and affairs of the partnership and the conduct of those activities and affairs; and

The means and conditions for amending the partnership agreement.

To the extent the partnership agreement does not provide for a matter described in subsection (a) of this section, this chapter governs the matter.

A partnership agreement may not:

Vary the law applicable under §

7-13.1-104

;

Vary a limited partnership’s capacity under §

7-13.1-111

to sue and be sued in its own name;

Vary any requirement, procedure, or other provision of this chapter pertaining to:

Registered agents; or

The secretary of state, including provisions pertaining to records authorized or required to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter;

Vary the provisions of §

7-13.1-204

;

Vary the right of a general partner under §

7-13.1-406(b)(2)

to vote on or consent to an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership which deletes a statement that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership;

Alter or eliminate the duty of loyalty or the duty of care except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section;

Eliminate the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing under §§

7-13.1-305(a)

and

7-13.1-409(d)

, but the partnership agreement may prescribe the standards, if not manifestly unreasonable, by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured;

Relieve or exonerate a person from liability for conduct involving bad faith, willful or intentional misconduct, or knowing violation of law;

Vary the information required under §

7-13.1-108

or unreasonably restrict the duties and rights under §

7-13.1-304

or

7-13.1-407

, but the partnership agreement may impose reasonable restrictions on the availability and use of information obtained under those sections and may define appropriate remedies, including liquidated damages, for a breach of any reasonable restriction on use;

Vary the grounds for expulsion specified in §

7-13.1-603(5)(ii)

;

Vary the power of a person to dissociate as a general partner under §

7-13.1-604(a)

, except to require that the notice under §

7-13.1-603(1)

be in a record;

Vary the causes of dissolution specified in §

7-13.1-801(a)(6)

;

Vary the requirement to wind up the partnership’s activities and affairs as specified in §

7-13.1-802(a)

, (b)(1), and (d);

Unreasonably restrict the right of a partner to maintain an action under part 9 of this chapter;

Vary the provisions of §

7-13.1-905

, but the partnership agreement may provide that the partnership may not have a special litigation committee;

Vary the right of a partner to approve a merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication under §

7-13.1-1123(a)(2)

,

7-13.1-1133(a)(2)

,

7-13.1-1143(a)(2)

, or

7-13.1-1153(a)(2)

;

Vary the required contents of a plan of merger under §

7-13.1-1122(a)

, plan of interest exchange under §

7-13.1-1132(a)

, plan of conversion under §

7-13.1-1142(a)

, or plan of domestication under §

7-13.1-1152(a)

; or

Except as otherwise provided in §§

7-13.1-106

and

7-13.1-107(b)

, restrict the rights under this chapter of a person other than a partner.

Subject to subsection (c)(8) of this section, without limiting other terms that may be included in a partnership agreement, the following rules apply:

The partnership agreement may:

Specify the method by which a specific act or transaction that would otherwise violate the duty of loyalty may be authorized or ratified by one or more disinterested and independent persons after full disclosure of all material facts; and

Alter the prohibition in §

7-13.1-504(a)(2)

so that the prohibition requires only that the partnership’s total assets not be less than the sum of its total liabilities.

If not manifestly unreasonable, the partnership agreement may:

Alter or eliminate the aspects of the duty of loyalty stated in §

7-13.1-409(b)

;

Identify specific types or categories of activities that do not violate the duty of loyalty;

Alter the duty of care, but may not authorize conduct involving bad faith, willful or intentional misconduct, or knowing violation of law; and

Alter or eliminate any other fiduciary duty.

The superior court shall decide as a matter of law whether a term of a partnership agreement is manifestly unreasonable under subsection (c)(7) or (d)(2) of this section. The superior court:

Shall make its determination as of the time the challenged term became part of the partnership agreement and by considering only circumstances existing at that time; and

May invalidate the term only if, in light of the purposes, activities, and affairs of the limited partnership, it is readily apparent that:

The objective of the term is unreasonable; or

The term is an unreasonable means to achieve its objective.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-106.
Partnership agreement — Effect on limited partnership and person becoming partner — Preformation agreement. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited partnership is bound by and may enforce the partnership agreement, whether or not the partnership has itself manifested assent to the agreement.

A person that becomes a partner is deemed to assent to the partnership agreement.

Two (2) or more persons intending to become the initial partners of a limited partnership may make an agreement providing that upon the formation of the partnership the agreement will become the partnership agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-107.
Partnership agreement — Effect on third parties and relationship to records effective on behalf of limited partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership agreement may specify that its amendment requires the approval of a person that is not a party to the agreement or the satisfaction of a condition. An amendment is ineffective if its adoption does not include the required approval or satisfy the specified condition.

The obligations of a limited partnership and its partners to a person in the person’s capacity as a transferee or person dissociated as a partner are governed by the partnership agreement. Subject only to a court order issued under §

7-13.1-703(b)(2)

to effectuate a charging order, an amendment to the partnership agreement made after a person becomes a transferee or is dissociated as a partner:

Is effective with regard to any debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership or its partners to the person in the person’s capacity as a transferee or person dissociated as a partner; and

Is not effective to the extent the amendment imposes a new debt, obligation, or other liability on the transferee or person dissociated as a partner.

If a record delivered by a limited partnership to the secretary of state for filing becomes effective and contains a provision that would be ineffective under §

7-13.1-105(c)

or (d)(2) if contained in the partnership agreement, the provision is ineffective in the record.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, if a record delivered by a limited partnership to the secretary of state for filing becomes effective and conflicts with a provision of the partnership agreement:

The agreement prevails as to partners, persons dissociated as partners, and transferees; and

The record prevails as to other persons to the extent they reasonably rely on the record.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-108.
Required information. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited partnership shall maintain at its principal office the following information:

A current list showing the full name and last known street and mailing address of each partner, separately identifying the general partners, in alphabetical order, and the limited partners, in alphabetical order;

A copy of the initial certificate of limited partnership and all amendments to and restatements of the certificate, together with signed copies of any powers of attorney under which any certificate, amendment, or restatement has been signed;

A copy of any filed articles of merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication;

A copy of the partnership’s federal, state, and local income tax returns and reports, if any, for the three (3) most recent years;

A copy of any partnership agreement made in a record and any amendment made in a record to any partnership agreement;

A copy of any financial statement of the partnership for the three (3) most recent years;

A copy of the three (3) most recent annual reports delivered by the partnership to the secretary of state pursuant to §

7-13.1-212

;

A copy of any record made by the partnership during the past three (3) years of any consent given by or vote taken of any partner pursuant to this chapter or the partnership agreement; and

Unless contained in a partnership agreement made in a record, a record stating:

A description and statement of the agreed value of contributions other than money made and agreed to be made by each partner;

The times at which, or events on the happening of which, any additional contributions agreed to be made by each partner are to be made;

For any person that is both a general partner and a limited partner, a specification of what transferable interest the person owns in each capacity; and

Any events upon the happening of which the partnership is to be dissolved and its activities and affairs wound up.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-109.
Dual capacity. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A person may be both a general partner and a limited partner. A person that is both a general and limited partner has the rights, powers, duties, and obligations provided by this chapter and the partnership agreement in each of those capacities. When the person acts as a general partner, the person is subject to the obligations, duties, and restrictions under this chapter and the partnership agreement for general partners. When the person acts as a limited partner, the person is subject to the obligations, duties, and restrictions under this chapter and the partnership agreement for limited partners.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-110.
Nature, purpose, and duration of limited partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited partnership is an entity distinct from its partners. A limited partnership is the same entity regardless of whether its certificate states that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership.

A limited partnership may have any lawful purpose, regardless of whether for profit.

A limited partnership has perpetual duration.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-111.
Powers. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited partnership has the capacity to sue and be sued in the name of the partnership and the power to do all things necessary or convenient to carry on the partnership’s activities and affairs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-112.
Application to existing relationships — Effect of repeal of prior acts. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Before January 1, 2024, this chapter governs only:

A limited partnership formed on or after January 1, 2023; and

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, a limited partnership formed before January 1, 2023, which elects, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be subject to this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, on and after January 1, 2024, this chapter governs all limited partnerships.

With respect to a limited partnership formed before January 1, 2023, the following rules apply except as the partners otherwise elect in the manner provided in the partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement:

Section

7-13.1-110(c)

does not apply and the limited partnership has whatever duration it had under the law applicable immediately before January 1, 2023.

The limited partnership is not required to amend its certificate of limited partnership to comply with §

7-13.1-201(b)(5)

.

Sections

7-13.1-601

and

7-13.1-602

do not apply and a limited partner has the same right and power to dissociate from the limited partnership, with the same consequences, as existed immediately before January 1, 2023.

Section

7-13.1-603(4)

does not apply.

Section

7-13.1-603(5)

does not apply and a court has the same power to expel a general partner as the court had immediately before January 1, 2023.

Section

7-13.1-801(a)(3)

does not apply and the connection between a person’s dissociation as a general partner and the dissolution of the limited partnership is the same as existed immediately before January 1, 2023.

With respect to a limited partnership that elects pursuant to subsection (a)(2) of this section to be subject to this chapter, after the election takes effect the provisions of this chapter relating to the liability of the limited partnership’s general partners to third parties apply:

Before January 1, 2024, to:

A third party that had not done business with the limited partnership in the year before the election took effect; and

A third party that had done business with the limited partnership in the year before the election took effect only if the third party knows or has been notified of the election; and

On and after January 1, 2024, to all third parties, but those provisions remain inapplicable to any obligation incurred while those provisions were inapplicable under subsection (d)(1)(ii) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-113.
Supplemental principles of law. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-114.
Permitted names. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The name of a limited partnership may contain the name of any partner.

The name of a limited partnership that is not a limited liability limited partnership must contain the phrase “limited partnership” or the abbreviation “LP” or “L.P.” and may not contain the phrase “limited liability limited partnership” or the abbreviation “LLLP” or “L.L.L.P.”.

The name of a limited liability limited partnership must contain the phrase “limited liability limited partnership” or the abbreviation “LLLP” or “L.L.L.P.” and must not contain the abbreviation “LP” or “L.P.”.

The name of a limited partnership, and the name under which a foreign limited partnership may register to do business in this state, must be distinguishable on the records of the secretary of state from any name of an existing person whose formation or qualification required the filing of a record by the secretary of state or any name that is filed, reserved, or registered under this chapter or as permitted by the laws of this state, subject to the following:

This provision does not apply if the applicant files with the secretary of state a certified copy of a final decree of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state; and

The name may be the same as the name of an existing person, the certificate of incorporation or organization of which has been revoked by the secretary of state as permitted by law, and the revocation has not been withdrawn within one year from the date of the revocation.

Words and/or abbreviations that are required by statute to identify the particular type of business entity shall be disregarded when determining if a name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the term “distinguishable upon the record” for the administration of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-114.1.
Fictitious business name. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Any domestic or foreign limited partnership formed under the laws of, or registered to do business in this state may transact business in this state under a fictitious name provided that it files a fictitious business name statement in accordance with this section prior to the time it commences to conduct business under the fictitious name.

A fictitious business name statement shall be filed with the secretary of state, and shall be executed, in the case of a domestic limited partnership, by at least one general partner and, in the case of a foreign limited partnership, by a person with authority to do so under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction of its formation, and shall state:

The fictitious business name to be used; and

The name of the applicant limited partnership or foreign limited partnership, and the state and date of its formation.

The fictitious business name statement expires upon the filing of a statement of abandonment of use of a fictitious business name registered in accordance with this section or upon the dissolution of the domestic limited partnership or the cancellation of registration of the foreign limited partnership.

The statement of abandonment of use of a fictitious business name under this section shall be filed with the secretary of state, shall be executed in the same manner provided in subsection (b) of this section, and shall state:

The fictitious business name being abandoned;

The date on which the original fictitious business name statement being abandoned was filed; and

The information presented in subsection (b)(2) of this section.

No domestic or foreign limited partnership transacting business under a fictitious business name contrary to the provisions of this section, or its assignee, may maintain any action upon or on account of any contract made, or transaction had, in the fictitious business name in any court of the state until a fictitious business name statement has been filed in accordance with this section.

No domestic or foreign limited partnership may be permitted to transact business under a fictitious business name pursuant to this section that is the same as the name of an existing person whose formation or qualification required the filing of a record by the secretary of state or any name that is filed, reserved, or registered under this title or as permitted by the laws of this state, subject to the following:

This provision does not apply if the applicant files with the secretary of state a certified copy of a final decree of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state; and

The name may be the same as the name of an existing person, the certificate of incorporation or organization of which has been revoked by the secretary of state as permitted by law, and the revocation has not been withdrawn within one year from the date of the revocation.

Words and/or abbreviations that are required by statute to identify the particular type of business entity shall be disregarded when determining if a name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the term “distinguishable upon the record” for the administration of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-115.
Reservation of name. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A person may reserve the exclusive use of a name that complies with §

7-13.1-114

by delivering an application to the secretary of state for filing. The application must state the name and address of the applicant and the name to be reserved. If the secretary of state finds that the name is available, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the applicant’s exclusive use for one hundred twenty (120) days.

The owner of a reserved name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the secretary of state a signed notice in a record of the transfer which states the name and address of the person to which the reservation is being transferred.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-116.
Registration of name. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A foreign limited partnership not registered to do business in this state under part 10 of this chapter may register its name, or an alternate name adopted pursuant to §

7-13.1-1006

, if the name is distinguishable on the records of the secretary of state from the names that are not available under §

7-13.1-114

.

To register its name or an alternate name adopted pursuant to §

7-13.1-1006

, a foreign limited partnership must deliver to the secretary of state for filing an application stating the partnership’s name, the jurisdiction and date of its formation, and any alternate name adopted pursuant to §

7-13.1-1006

. If the secretary of state finds that the name applied for is available, the secretary of state shall register the name for the applicant’s exclusive use.

The registration of a name under this section is effective for one year after the date of registration.

A foreign limited partnership whose name registration is effective may renew the registration for successive one-year periods by delivering, not earlier than three (3) months before the expiration of the registration, to the secretary of state for filing a renewal application that complies with this section. When filed, the renewal application renews the registration for a succeeding one-year period.

A foreign limited partnership whose name registration is effective may register as a foreign limited partnership under the registered name or consent in a signed record to the use of that name by another person that is not an individual.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-117.
Registered agent. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Each limited partnership and each registered foreign limited partnership shall designate and maintain a registered agent in this state. The designation of a registered agent is an affirmation of fact by the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership that the agent has consented to serve.

A registered agent for a limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership must be an existing person and have a place of business in this state.

The only duties under this chapter of a registered agent that has complied with this chapter are:

To forward to the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership at the address most recently supplied to the agent by the partnership or foreign partnership any process, notice, or demand pertaining to the partnership or foreign partnership which is served on or received by the agent;

If the registered agent resigns, to provide the notice required by §

7-13.1-119(c)

to the partnership or foreign partnership at the address most recently supplied to the agent by the partnership or foreign partnership; and

To keep current the information with respect to the agent in the records of the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-118.
Change of registered agent or address for registered agent by limited partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership may change its registered agent or the address of its registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change that states:

The name of the partnership or foreign partnership; and

The information that is to be in effect as a result of the filing of the statement of change.

The general or limited partners of a limited partnership need not approve the delivery to the secretary of state for filing of:

A statement of change under this section; or

A similar filing changing the registered agent or registered office, if any, of the partnership in any other jurisdiction.

A statement of change under this section designating a new registered agent is an affirmation of fact by the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership that the agent has consented to serve.

Any person who designates a registered agent without the registered agent’s authority is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment of not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-119.
Resignation of registered agent. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A registered agent may resign as an agent for a limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of resignation that states:

The name of the partnership or foreign partnership;

The name of the agent;

That the agent resigns from serving as registered agent for the partnership or foreign partnership; and

The address of the partnership or foreign partnership to which the secretary of state will send the notice required by subsection (c) of this section.

A statement of resignation takes effect on the earlier of:

The thirty-first day after the day on which it is filed by the secretary of state; or

The designation of a new registered agent for the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership.

A registered agent promptly shall furnish to the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership notice in a record of the date on which a statement of resignation was filed.

When a statement of resignation takes effect, the registered agent ceases to have responsibility under this chapter for any matter thereafter tendered to it as agent for the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership. The resignation does not affect any contractual rights the partnership or foreign partnership has against the agent or that the agent has against the partnership or foreign partnership.

A registered agent may resign with respect to a limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership whether or not the partnership or foreign partnership is in good standing.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-120.
Change of name or address by registered agent. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

If a registered agent changes its name or address, the agent may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change that states:

The name of the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership represented by the registered agent;

The name of the agent as currently shown in the records of the secretary of state for the partnership or foreign partnership;

If the name of the agent has changed, its new name; and

If the address of the agent has changed, its new address.

A registered agent promptly shall furnish notice to the represented limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership of the filing by the secretary of state of the statement of change and the changes made by the statement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.